Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-169
Compensation court; proceedings; transcripts.

A transcribed copy of the evidence and proceedings, or any specific part thereof, of any investigation taken by a stenographer for the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court or by a court reporter appointed or furnished as provided in section 48-178, being certified and sworn to by such stenographer or court reporter, to be a true and correct transcript of the testimony, or of a particular witness, or any specific part thereof, or to be a correct copy of the transcript of the proceedings had on such investigation so purporting to be taken and transcribed, may be received in evidence by the compensation court with the same effect as if such stenographer or court reporter were present and testified to the facts certified. A copy of such transcript shall be furnished on demand to any party in interest upon payment of the fee therefor, as provided for transcripts in the district courts of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1917, c. 85, § 29, p. 221;

C.S.1922, § 3080;

C.S.1929, § 48-157;

Laws 1935, c. 57, § 36, p. 205;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-157;

R.S.1943, § 48-169;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 102;

Laws 1992, LB 360, § 18.